src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
* сыр00такы examples:*
## Realization of glottal stops

### SURFACE CONSONANT

**х:с in яха**

* яха%^A2I examples:*

* еси0 examples:*

**С1:с GlottalNonNasalToSurface**

* ман°С1%>°ць° examples:*

* ман0с0аць0 examples:*

**%{дˮØ%}:д GlottalNonNasalToSurface**

* мя%{дˮØ%}%>°ць° examples:*

* мя00аць0 examples:*

**%{дˮØ%}:д GlottalNonNasalToSurface**

**ь:0 with  GlottalNonNasalToZERO**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-yrk/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
